Idaho statutes. Title 44 LABOR
Chapter 27
AGREEMENTS AND COVENANTS PROTECTING LEGITIMATE BUSINESS INTERESTS

Sec.

§ 44-2701. Agreements and covenants protecting legitimate business interests.

A key employee or key independent contractor may enter into a written agreement or covenant that protects the employer’s legitimate business interests and prohibits the key employee or key independent contractor from engaging in employment or a line of business that is in direct competition with the employer’s business after termination of employment, and the same shall be enforceable, if the agreement or covenant is reasonable as to its duration, geographical area, type of employment or line of business, and does not impose a greater restraint than is reasonably necessary to protect the employer’s legitimate business interests.

§ 44-2702. Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Key employees” and “key independent contractors” shall include those employees or independent contractors who, by reason of the employer’s investment of time, money, trust, exposure to the public, or exposure to technologies, intellectual property, business plans, business processes and methods of operation, customers, vendors or other business relationships during the course of employment, have gained a high level of inside knowledge, influence, credibility, notoriety, fame, reputation or public persona as a representative or spokesperson of the employer and, as a result, have the ability to harm or threaten an employer’s legitimate business interests.

“Legitimate business interests” shall include, but not be limited to, an employer’s goodwill, technologies, intellectual property, business plans, business processes and methods of operation, customers, customer lists, customer contacts and referral sources, vendors and vendor contacts, financial and marketing information, and trade secrets as that term is defined by chapter 8, title 48, Idaho Code.

§ 44-2703. Construction and enforcement.

To the extent any such agreement or covenant is found to be unreasonable in any respect, a court shall limit or modify the agreement or covenant as it shall determine necessary to reflect the intent of the parties and render it reasonable in light of the circumstances in which it was made and specifically enforce the agreement or covenant as limited or modified.

§ 44-2704. Restriction of direct competition — Rebuttable presumptions.

Under no circumstances shall a provision of such agreement or covenant, as set forth herein, establish a postemployment restriction of direct competition that exceeds a period of eighteen (18) months from the time of the key employee’s or key independent contractor’s termination unless consideration, in addition to employment or continued employment, is given to a key employee or key independent contractor. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit a party’s ability to otherwise protect trade secrets or other information deemed proprietary or confidential.

It shall be a rebuttable presumption that an agreement or covenant with a postemployment term of eighteen (18) months or less is reasonable as to duration.

It shall be a rebuttable presumption that an agreement or covenant is reasonable as to geographic area if it is restricted to the geographic areas in which the key employee or key independent contractor provided services or had a significant presence or influence.

It shall be a rebuttable presumption that an agreement or covenant is reasonable as to type of employment or line of business if it is limited to the type of employment or line of business conducted by the key employee or key independent contractor, as defined in section 44-2702, Idaho Code, while working for the employer.

It shall be a rebuttable presumption that an employee or independent contractor who is among the highest paid five percent (5%) of the employer’s employees or independent contractors is a “key employee” or a “key independent contractor.” To rebut such presumption, an employee or independent contractor must show that it has no ability to adversely affect the employer’s legitimate business interests.